Hawaii statutes.
§668-2 Necessary parties; unknown owners.
[(a)] Subject to the rules of court and section 668-8.5, plaintiff shall join
as a party every person having or claiming to have, as far as known to the
plaintiff, any legal or equitable right, title, or interest in the property
described in the complaint or any part thereof or any lien or other claim with
respect thereto. Such persons shall be named in the complaint as far as known
to the plaintiff.

[(b)] All persons interested or who may claim
any interest in the premises who cannot be identified or whose names are
unknown to the plaintiff, shall be made parties as provided by the rules of
court. [L 1923, c 178, §2; RL 1925, §2762; am L 1929, c 83, §1; RL 1935, §4741;
RL 1945, §12451; RL 1955, §337-2; HRS §668-2; am L 1972, c 90, §11(b); gen ch
1985]

Case Notes

Petition to partition equitable title allowed without joining
trustees who held legal title under trust for execution of mortgage, since
discharged. 10 H. 487 (1896).

Intervening minor. 30 H. 323 (1928).

Unborn heirs. 31 H. 517 (1930).

State not "person" having interest; no waiver of
sovereign immunity. 48 H. 92, 96, 395 P.2d 620 (1964).

Cited: 35 H. 262, 292 (1939).

Previous
Vol13_Ch0601-0676
Next